District of Columbia statutes.
47-4803

Eligibility.

(a)

A taxpayer may receive a District of Columbia low-income housing tax credit with respect to a qualified project; provided, that the Department issues an eligibility statement for that qualified project.

(b)

The total District of Columbia low-income housing tax credit available to a qualified District of Columbia project shall be authorized and allocated by the Department based on the qualified project’s need for the credit for economic feasibility.

(c)

The District of Columbia low-income housing tax credit shall be taken against the income, insurance premium, or franchise taxes imposed under this title, claimed equally for 10 years, subtracted from the amount of District of Columbia tax otherwise due for each taxable period and shall not be refundable; provided, that the credit may not be taken against any tax that is dedicated in whole or in part to the Healthy DC and Health Care Expansion Fund established by § 31-3514.02. Any amount of the low-income housing tax credit that exceeds the tax due for a taxable year may be carried forward to any of the 10 remaining subsequent taxable years.

(d)

(1)

All or any portion of District of Columbia tax credits issued in accordance with the provisions of this section may be allocated to parties who are eligible under the provisions of subsection (a) of this section.

(2)

An owner of a qualified project shall certify to the Chief Financial Officer the amount of credit allocated to the owner. The owner of the qualified project shall provide to the Chief Financial Officer appropriate information so that the low-income housing tax credit can be properly allocated.

(e)

If the recapture of District of Columbia low-income housing tax credits is required pursuant to § 47-4804(a) or (b), any statement submitted to the Chief Financial Officer as provided in this section shall include the:

(1)

Proportion of the District of Columbia credit required to be recaptured;

(2)

Identity of each taxpayer subject to the recapture; and

(3)

Amount of credit previously allocated to such taxpayer.

(f)

(1)

A tax credit allowed under this section shall not be denied to the taxpayer with respect to any qualified project merely by reason of a right of first refusal held by the tenants, in cooperative form or otherwise, or resident management corporation of such building or by a qualified nonprofit organization, as defined in section 42 of the 1986 Internal Revenue Code, as amended and in effect for the taxable year, or government agency to purchase the qualified District of Columbia project after the close of the compliance period for a price which is not less than the minimum purchase price determined under paragraph (2) of this subsection.

(2)

The minimum purchase price shall be an amount equal to the sum of the principal amount of outstanding indebtedness secured by the building, other than indebtedness incurred within the 5-year period ending on the date of the sale pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, and all federal and District taxes attributable to the sale.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7142(b), 61 DCR 9990